Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201918-818
Revenue bonds; securities.

(1) Revenue bonds issued by a regional metropolitan transit authority under the Regional Metropolitan Transit Authority Act are hereby made securities in which (a) the state and all its political subdivisions and their officers, boards, commissions, departments, or other agencies, (b) all banks, bankers, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, investment companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business, (c) all administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries, and (d) all other persons whatsoever who now are or may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligation of the state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital belonging to them or within their control.

(2) Such revenue bonds or other securities or obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any state or municipal officer or any agency of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is authorized by law.

Laws 2019, LB492, § 18.